Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.090

Removal of a commission member.

If a commission member fails or refuses to perform his or her duties due to excessive absence or abandonment of his or her position or engages in any acts of dishonesty or willful misconduct, a majority of a quorum of the commission may recommend in writing to the director that the commission member be removed from his or her position on the commission. Upon receiving this recommendation, the director shall review the matter, including any statement from the commission member who is the subject of the recommendation, and determine whether adequate cause for removal is present. If the director finds that adequate cause for removal exists, the director shall remove the member from his or her commission position. The position is then vacant and must be filled as set forth in this chapter.

[ 2009 c 33 s 9.]